Utah statutes.
48-2c-1102.   Rights of assignee.

An assignment of an interest in a company does not entitle the assignee to participate in the management and affairs of the company or to vote or to become a member or to exercise any rights of a member or manager.  An assignment only entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, any share of profits and losses and distributions to which the assignor would be entitled.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

